Illinois, session 104th, HB1027.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-169 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-169)7    Sec. 15-169. Homestead exemption for veterans with 8disabilities and veterans of World War II.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption, limited as provided in this Section, is granted for 11property that is used as a qualified residence by a veteran 12with a disability, and beginning with taxable year 2024, an 13annual homestead exemption, limited to the amounts set forth 14in subsection (b-4), is granted for property that is used as a 15qualified residence by a veteran who was a member of the United 16States Armed Forces during World War II.17    (b) For taxable years prior to 2015, the amount of the 18exemption under this Section is as follows:19        (1) for veterans with a service-connected disability 20    of at least (i) 75% for exemptions granted in taxable 21    years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% for exemptions 22    granted in taxable year 2010 and each taxable year 23    thereafter, as certified by the United States Department   HB1027- 2 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1    of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is $5,000; and2        (2) for veterans with a service-connected disability 3    of at least 50%, but less than (i) 75% for exemptions 4    granted in taxable years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% 5    for exemptions granted in taxable year 2010 and each 6    taxable year thereafter, as certified by the United States 7    Department of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is 8    $2,500.9    (b-3) For taxable years 2015 through 2022:10        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 11    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 12    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 13    annual exemption is $2,500;14        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 15    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 16    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 17    annual exemption is $5,000;18        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 19    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 20    Department of Veterans Affairs, then the property is 21    exempt from taxation under this Code; and22        (4) (Blank). 23    (b-3.1) For taxable year 2023 and thereafter: 24        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 25    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 26    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the   HB1027- 3 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 2    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 3    annual exemption is $2,500; 4        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 5    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 6    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 7    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 8    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 9    annual exemption is $5,000; 10        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 11    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 12    Department of Veterans Affairs as of the date the 13    application is submitted for the exemption under this 14    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 15    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 16    exempt from taxation under this Code; and 17        (4) if the taxpayer is the surviving spouse of a 18    veteran whose death was determined to be service-connected 19    and who is certified by the United States Department of 20    Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and 21    indemnity compensation under federal law as of the date 22    the application is submitted for the exemption under this 23    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 24    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 25    also exempt from taxation under this Code. 26    This amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly shall   HB1027- 4 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1not be used as the basis for any appeal filed with the chief 2county assessment officer, the board of review, the Property 3Tax Appeal Board, or the circuit court with respect to the 4scope or meaning of the exemption under this Section for a tax 5year prior to tax year 2023. 6    (b-4) For taxable years on or after 2024, if the veteran 7was a member of the United States Armed Forces during World War 8II, then the property is exempt from taxation under this Code 9regardless of the veteran's level of disability. 10    (b-5) If a homestead exemption is granted under this 11Section and the person awarded the exemption subsequently 12becomes a resident of a facility licensed under the Nursing 13Home Care Act or a facility operated by the United States 14Department of Veterans Affairs, then the exemption shall 15continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be occupied 16by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the residence 17remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person who 18qualified for the homestead exemption. 19    (c) The tax exemption under this Section carries over to 20the benefit of the veteran's surviving spouse as long as the 21spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead 22and , permanently resides thereon, and does not remarry. For 23taxable years before taxable year 2025, the exemption does not 24carry over to the benefit of the veteran's surviving spouse if 25the surviving spouse is remarried. For taxable year 2025 and 26thereafter, the exemption carries over to the benefit of the   HB1027- 5 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1veteran's surviving spouse regardless of whether or not the 2surviving spouse is remarried as long as the surviving spouse 3holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead and 4permanently resides thereon. If the surviving spouse sells the 5property, an exemption not to exceed the amount granted from 6the most recent ad valorem tax roll may be transferred to his 7or her new residence as long as it is used as his or her 8primary residence and he or she does not remarry.9    As used in this subsection (c):10        (1) for taxable years prior to 2015, "surviving 11    spouse" means the surviving spouse of a veteran who 12    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 13    her death;14        (2) for taxable years 2015 through 2022, "surviving 15    spouse" means (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 16    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 17    her death and (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 18    was killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 19    expiration of the application period in effect for the 20    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 21    sought; and22        (3) for taxable year 2023 and thereafter, "surviving 23    spouse" means: (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 24    obtained the exemption under this Section prior to his or 25    her death; (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who was 26    killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the   HB1027- 6 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1    expiration of the application period in effect for the 2    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 3    sought; (iii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who did 4    not obtain an exemption under this Section before death, 5    but who would have qualified for the exemption under this 6    Section in the taxable year for which the exemption is 7    sought if he or she had survived, and whose surviving 8    spouse has been a resident of Illinois from the time of the 9    veteran's death through the taxable year for which the 10    exemption is sought; and (iv) the surviving spouse of a 11    veteran whose death was determined to be 12    service-connected, but who would not otherwise qualify 13    under item (i), (ii), or (iii), if the spouse (A) is 14    certified by the United States Department of Veterans 15    Affairs as a recipient of dependency and indemnity 16    compensation under federal law at any time prior to the 17    expiration of the application period in effect for the 18    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 19    sought and (B) remains eligible for that dependency and 20    indemnity compensation as of January 1 of the taxable year 21    for which the exemption is sought.22    (c-1) Beginning with taxable year 2015, nothing in this 23Section shall require the veteran to have qualified for or 24obtained the exemption before death if the veteran was killed 25in the line of duty. 26    (d) The exemption under this Section applies for taxable   HB1027- 7 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1year 2007 and thereafter. A taxpayer who claims an exemption 2under Section 15-165 or 15-168 may not claim an exemption 3under this Section.4    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (e), 5each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under this 6Section must reapply on an annual basis, except that a veteran 7who qualifies as a result of his or her service in World War II 8need not reapply. Application must be made during the 9application period in effect for the county of his or her 10residence. The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 11determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 12the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 13application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or other 14reasonable methods. The determination must be made in 15accordance with guidelines established by the Department.16    On and after May 23, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 17102-895), if a veteran has a combined service connected 18disability rating of 100% and is deemed to be permanently and 19totally disabled, as certified by the United States Department 20of Veterans Affairs, the taxpayer who has been granted an 21exemption under this Section shall no longer be required to 22reapply for the exemption on an annual basis, and the 23exemption shall be in effect for as long as the exemption would 24otherwise be permitted under this Section. 25    (e-1) If the person qualifying for the exemption does not 26occupy the qualified residence as of January 1 of the taxable   HB1027- 8 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1year, the exemption granted under this Section shall be 2prorated on a monthly basis. The prorated exemption shall 3apply beginning with the first complete month in which the 4person occupies the qualified residence. 5    (e-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 6chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 7the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 8that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 9year, provided that: 10        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 11    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 12    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 13        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 14    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 15    as of January 1, 2019; 16        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 17    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 18    this Code; and 19        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 20    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 21    taxable years. 22    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 23service connected disability rating has changed since the 2019 24exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 25the subsequent service connected disability rating. 26    (e-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each   HB1027- 9 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 2the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 3that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 4year, if:5        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 6    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 7    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;8        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 9    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 10    as of January 1, 2020;11        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 12    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 13    this Code; and14        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 15    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 16    taxable years.17    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 18service connected disability rating has changed since the 2020 19exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 20the subsequent service connected disability rating. 21    (f) For the purposes of this Section:22    "Qualified residence" means, before tax year 2023, real 23property, but less any portion of that property that is used 24for commercial purposes, with an equalized assessed value of 25less than $250,000 that is the primary residence of a veteran 26with a disability. "Qualified residence" means, for tax year   HB1027- 10 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b12023 and thereafter, real property, but less any portion of 2that property that is used for commercial purposes, that is 3the primary residence of a veteran with a disability. Property 4rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used for 5commercial purposes.6    "Service-connected disability" means an illness or injury 7(i) that was caused by or worsened by active military service, 8(ii) that is a current disability as of the date of the 9application for the exemption under this Section for the 10applicable tax year, as demonstrated by the veteran's United 11States Department of Veterans Affairs certification, and (iii) 12for which the veteran receives disability compensation. 13    For tax years 2022 and prior, "veteran" means an Illinois 14resident who has served as a member of the United States Armed 15Forces on active duty or State active duty, a member of the 16Illinois National Guard, or a member of the United States 17Reserve Forces and who has received an honorable discharge. 18For taxable years 2023 and thereafter, "veteran" means an 19Illinois resident who has served as a member of the United 20States Armed Forces on active duty or State active duty, a 21member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 22United States Reserve Forces and who has a service-connected 23disability, as certified by the United States Department of 24Veterans Affairs, and receives disability compensation. 25(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 26103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-596, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB1027- 11 -LRB104 03169 HLH 13190 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.